Arkansas statutes. Title 13 Libraries, Archives, and Cultural Resources
Chapter 2 Libraries
13-2-402. Librarian.

(a)

No person shall be appointed to the office of county librarian unless prior to appointment the person is recommended for appointment by the county library board, if the board has been created.

(b)

The county librarian shall conduct the library according to the most acceptable library methods.

History.

Acts 1927, No. 244, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 2632; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-1004; Acts 1997, No. 402, § 2.

13-2-403. Multidistrict counties.

In any county in this state which is divided into two (2) districts and which has two (2) county seats, each district of the county may be considered as an individual county for the purpose of levying a county library tax under the provisions of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 38.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 239, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-1001.1.

13-2-404. County public library fund — Claims.

(a)(1)

All tax and other county-appropriated funds of the county public library shall be in the custody of the county treasurer and shall constitute a separate fund, to be known as the “county public library fund”.

(2)(A)

A county that supports a county public library or library system with a library tax under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 38, shall by ordinance of the quorum court of the county levy a tax at a millage rate approved by the voters on all taxable property within the county to be used for the support, operation, and maintenance of the public library or public library system located in the county.

(B)

As used in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 38, “maintaining and operating” a public county library or a county library service or system includes the:

(i)

Repair and upkeep of property and equipment;

(ii)

Overhead and ongoing costs; and

(iii)

General and administrative expenses.

(C)

Except as otherwise provided in the ordinance, “maintaining and operating” includes without limitation:

(i)

Postage, telephone, and Internet services;

(ii)

Printing;

(iii)

Library-owned motor vehicle expenses;

(iv)

Advertising;

(v)

Minor and major repairs;

(vi)

Maintenance contracts;

(vii)

Lawn care services;

(viii)

Utilities and fuel;

(ix)

Rent and lease payments;

(x)

Insurance premiums;

(xi)

Association and membership dues;

(xii)

Contractual services not otherwise classified;

(xiii)

Consumable supplies, materials, and commodities;

(xiv)

Court costs;

(xv)

Equipment not capitalized;

(xvi)

Applicable petty cash reimbursements, laundry, and taxes;

(xvii)

Travel, subsistence, meals, lodging, and transportation of county library employees or officials traveling on official business; and

(xviii)

Such other items and expenses as may be considered maintaining and operating a public county library or a county library service or system under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 38.

(3)

In addition to the levy authorized by this section, the quorum court in a county may appropriate from any available funds for the support, operation, and maintenance of a public library or public library system located in the county.

(4)

Further, the quorum court in a county may appropriate from the county funds and any other available funds for the support, operation, and maintenance of a regional public library system in which the county has agreed to participate in coordination with the libraries of other counties and other cities.

(b)(1)

Funds received by the county public library by gift, bequest, devise, or donation or from fees or fines may remain in the custody of the county library board, if a board has been created, or deposited with the county treasurer for the county public library fund if the county library board so chooses or if a board has not been created.

(2)

Funds retained by the county library board shall be used by it for the establishment, expansion, construction, maintenance, and operation of the county library.

(c)(1)

No claim against the fund shall be approved by the county court until acted upon by the governing library board, if a governing library board has been created, and payment authorized by the governing library board.

(2)

When certified as a valid claim by the governing library board, the claim shall be acted upon as all other claims against the county.

(3)(A)(i)

Pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the quorum court at the request of the governing library board, the governing library board may certify to the county treasurer a claim against the fund for an amount equal to the undistributed balance of the fund.

(ii)

The ordinance shall specify the frequency that the claim may be made. The frequency shall not be more than monthly.

(B)

The claim shall be acted upon as all other claims against the county.

(C)

When the claim is paid, the funds shall be in the custody of the governing library board and shall be subject to expenditure pursuant to an appropriate resolution or budget adopted by the governing library board.

History.

Acts 1927, No. 244, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 2630; Acts 1981, No. 49, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 17-1002; Acts 1995, No. 232, § 2; 1997, No. 402, § 3; 2005, No. 1162, § 1; 2009, No. 570, § 1; 2009, No. 764, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 2009, No. 764. Subsection (a)(2)(B) was also added by Acts 2009, No. 570, to read as follows: “(B) Maintenance and operation costs include rental costs paid for the library facility.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 764 inserted (a)(2)(B) and (C) and redesignated the remaining text of (a)(2) accordingly.

13-2-405. Surplus funds — Matching funds.

(a)

The governing board of any county public library is authorized to use any surplus funds available in the operating or maintenance account of the public library for matching federal or other funds available for financing necessary expansions or improvements of the public library.

(b)

Before using any of the funds for the purposes of this section, the governing board of the county public library shall adopt a resolution setting forth the:

(1)

Amount of the funds to be used;

(2)

Purposes for which the funds are to be used;

(3)

Amount of matching funds to be derived by the use of the funds; and

(4)

Nature of the expansions or improvements to be made.

(c)

The resolution shall include a declaration that the use of the funds will not jeopardize any existing program of the county public library and that the funds are not needed for any existing or anticipated maintenance or operating purpose of the library.

(d)

The governing board of any county library using funds as authorized in this section is authorized to enter into contracts or agreements necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(e)(1)

With respect to the purposes of this section, the governing board is authorized to accept gifts, grants, or donations of both real and personal property from the federal government or from any person, firm, or corporation.

(2)

These gifts, grants, or donations shall be used for the purposes of the expansion or improvement of the public library.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 402, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-3205.1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1965, No. 402, § 1, is also codified as §13-2-504.

13-2-406. Library services for outside the county — Fees for county public libraries.

(a)

Any county public library may extend the privilege and use of the library and library services to persons residing outside the county upon the terms and conditions as the library boards may prescribe by regulation or policy.

(b)

In addition, reasonable reimbursements may be collected by the county public library for providing any special library services beyond the customary library services, provided that they are determined in advance and in writing by the library board, if a board has been created.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 4.

13-2-407. Joint city-county and regional public library systems.

(a)(1)

Any county library board, with the consent of its county quorum court, the board of trustees of any municipal public library, any group of municipal public libraries, and any combination of counties and cities may contract with each other or among themselves to create, maintain, and support a joint city-county public library system or regional public library system or may enter into an interlocal cooperation agreement among themselves to coordinate public library services among the different jurisdictions.

(2)

Such a contract, interlocal agreement, or other arrangement shall contain terms, agreements, and conditions as may be agreed upon by the county library board, the county quorum court, and the board of trustees of the several municipalities with the final approval of the governing body of the cities.

(3)

The expenses of the regional public library system or the cooperating libraries shall be apportioned between or among the entities concerned on such a basis as shall be agreed upon in the ordinance, contract, arrangement, or interlocal agreement.

(4)

The library system headquarters building shall be located at a place in one (1) of the counties to be agreed upon by the quorum courts of the various counties in the regional public library or with a cooperating library system.

(b)

Any county library board may contract with an entity to provide library services at any location.

(c)

Any joint city-county public library system or regional public library system may extend the privilege and use of the library and library services to persons residing outside the several jurisdictions of the library system upon the terms and conditions as the several library boards may prescribe by regulations or policy.

(d)(1)

If not provided for by the library system or by one (1) of the participating jurisdictions of the library system, all eligible employees of a joint city-county library or a regional public library system shall be entitled to the comparable retirement and fringe benefit coverage as are other county employees in the headquarters county.

(2)

Costs for these benefits shall be apportioned among the participating jurisdictions of the joint city-county library or a regional public library system.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 5.

13-2-408. Injuries to county public library property — Penalty.

(a)

In addition to any penalties prescribed and notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in the Arkansas Library Materials Security Law, §13-2-801 et seq., the county quorum court shall have the power to pass ordinances imposing suitable penalties for the punishment of persons committing injury upon library grounds or property or injuring or failing to return any book, periodical, or property belonging to the library.

(b)

The county library board or the county librarian may refuse the use of the library to such offenders.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 6.

13-2-409. County library tax petition — Filing fee.

When a petition is filed as authorized in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 38, as amended by Amendment 72, to submit to the electors of a county the question of levying, increasing, decreasing, or repealing a county library tax and the petition or the sponsor of the petition requests that the question be submitted at a special election, the sponsor of the petition may be required by the county quorum court to pay a filing fee not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) which shall be used to offset a portion of the cost of calling and conducting the special election.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1377, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§13-2-401 —13-2-408 may not apply to this section, which was enacted subsequently.

Subchapter 5

— Municipal Libraries and Reading Rooms

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Cross References.

Local government reserve funds, §14-73-101 et seq.

Public bodies corporate and politic, §25-20-201 et seq.

Public libraries, Ark. Const. Amend. 30.

13-2-501. Establishment — Appropriations.

(a)(1)

The city council or governing body of any city of the first class may by ordinance establish and maintain a public library for the use and benefit of the inhabitants of the city.

(2)

The governing body of any city which levies a city library tax in accordance with Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 30, shall establish, operate, and maintain a city public library or library services for the citizens of the city.

(b)(1)

In a city of the first class, on petition of five percent (5%) of the voters requesting the establishment of a public library, the city council or governing body of the municipality within thirty (30) days after the filing of the petition shall call an election to be held in accordance with §7-11-201 et seq.

(2)(A)

The election shall be advertised and conducted as special elections are required by law to be advertised and conducted.

(B)

The ballots shall be marked “FOR Public Library”, “AGAINST Public Library”.

(3)

If a majority of the electors voting at the election vote in favor of the establishment of a public library, it shall be the duty of the city council or the governing body of the municipality immediately to establish a public library and continue to maintain it in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(c)

When a public library has been established, the city council or the governing body of the municipality may allot for library purposes a prescribed proportion of its municipal revenues to be used exclusively for the maintenance of the public library.

(d)(1)

A city which supports a city public library or library system with a city library tax under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 30, shall by ordinance of the governing body of the municipality appropriate all tax revenues raised by the millage approved by the voters on all taxable property within the city to be used for the support, operation, and maintenance of the public library or public library system located in the city or for library services from within a library system in which the city participates.

(2)

In addition to the levy authorized in this subsection, the governing body of the municipality may make contributions from any available funds for the support, operation, and maintenance of a city public library or public library system located in the city or for library services from within a library system in which the city participates.

(3)

Further, the governing body of a municipality may make contributions from the city funds and any other available funds for the support, operation, and maintenance of a joint city-county or regional public library system in which the city has agreed to participate in coordination with the libraries of other cities and other counties.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 177, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 9590; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-3201; Acts 1991, No. 417, § 1; 1997, No. 402, § 7; 2005, No. 2145, § 17; 2007, No. 1049, § 34; 2009, No. 1480, § 49.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “§7-11-201 et seq.”
for “§7-5-103(b)” in (b)(1).

13-2-502. Board of trustees.

(a)(1)

When any city council or governing body of a city of the first class has decided to establish and maintain a public library under this subchapter, the mayor of the city with the approval of the city council shall appoint a board of not fewer than five (5) trustees nor more than seven (7) trustees for the library.

(2)

The trustees shall be chosen from the citizens at large with reference to their fitness for the office.

(3)

Before entering upon the duties of their office, the trustees shall make oath or affirmation before some judicial officer that they will discharge the duties enjoined upon them.

(b)

The trustees shall receive no compensation for their services.

(c)(1)

Two (2) trustees shall hold office for two (2) years, two (2) for four (4) years, and one (1) or more members for five (5) years from the January 1 following their appointment in each case. At the first meeting they shall cast lots for their respective terms, reporting the result to the council or governing body. All subsequent terms shall be for five (5) years.

(2)

However, all trustees appointed after January 1, 1998, shall serve terms of five (5) years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Any trustee may succeed himself or herself in office.

(d)(1)

The removal of any trustee permanently from the city or his or her absence from four (4) consecutive meetings of the board without due explanation of absence shall render his or her office as trustee vacant.

(2)

Vacancies on the board shall be filled by the mayor with the approval of the city council or governing body.

(e)

Immediately after their appointment, the trustees shall meet and organize by the election of one (1) of their number as president and by the election of such other officers as they may deem necessary.

(f)

The trustees shall make and adopt such bylaws, rules, and regulations for their own guidance as they see fit.

(g)

The trustees shall meet once a calendar quarter, or more often if necessary, for the transaction of business.

(h)

With the final approval of the city council or governing body of the municipality, the trustees shall have the authority:

(1)

To negotiate and carry out all agreements between the city public library and the governing boards of the several city libraries and any counties participating in a joint city-county library or a regional library system; or

(2)

To coordinate any and all library services for their city under an interlocal cooperation agreement.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 177, §§ 2-4; Pope's Dig., §§ 9591-9593; Acts 1973, No. 56, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-3202 — 19-3204; Acts 1997, No. 204, § 1; 1997, No. 402, § 8; 2001, No. 630, § 1; 2001, No. 1515, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment, by No. 630, redesignated the former (c)(1) as the present (c); added the last sentence in (c); and deleted (c)(2).

The 2001 amendment, by No. 1515, deleted “or has decided to provide library services to its citizens through participation in a library system” preceding “under this subchapter” in (a)(1); and substituted “the trustees” for “they” in (a)(3).

13-2-503. Powers of trustees — Librarian and staff.

(a)(1)

All moneys received for library purposes, whether by taxation or otherwise, shall belong to and be designated as the library fund.

(2)

The moneys shall be kept separate and apart from other funds of the city and drawn upon by the proper officers of the library upon the properly authenticated invoices of the library board of trustees.

(b)(1)

The board shall have exclusive control of the expenditures of all moneys collected to the credit of the library fund and of the construction of any library building.

(2)

The board shall have the supervision, care, and custody of the grounds, rooms, or buildings constructed, leased, or set apart for library purposes.

(c)(1)(A)

The board shall have the power to purchase or lease grounds or to purchase, lease, erect, and occupy appropriate buildings for the use of the library.

(B)

When a building erected or purchased by the board is not adapted to its purpose or needs, the board may remodel or reconstruct the building.

(2)

The board may also sell or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property that it deems no longer necessary or useful for library purposes.

(d)(1)

The board shall have the power to appoint a librarian qualified by education, training, experience, and personality, who shall serve at the will of the board.

(2)

The board shall have the power to appoint necessary assistants and other members of the staff, basing their appointment on the recommendation of the librarian.

(e)

The board shall have the power to make necessary rules and regulations for administering the library and shall make provisions for representation at library conventions.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 177, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 9594; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-3205; Acts 2005, No. 1246, § 1.

Cross References.

Exemption from civil service commission act, §14-49-301.

13-2-504. Surplus funds — Matching funds.

(a)

The board of trustees of any city public library is authorized to use any surplus funds available in the operating or maintenance account of the library for matching federal or other funds available for financing necessary expansions or improvements of the library.

(b)

Before using any of the funds for the purposes of this section, the board shall adopt a resolution setting forth the amount of the funds to be used, the purposes for which the funds are to be used, the amount of matching funds to be derived by the use of the funds, and the nature of the expansions or improvements to be made.

(c)

The resolution shall include a declaration that the use of the funds will not jeopardize any existing program of the library and that the funds are not needed for any existing or anticipated maintenance or operating purpose of the library.

(d)

The board, using funds as authorized in this section, is authorized to enter into contracts or agreements necessary to accomplish the purposes of this section.

(e)

With respect to the purposes of this section, the board is authorized to accept gifts, grants, or donations of real or personal property from the federal government or from any person, firm, or corporation, to be used for the purposes of the expansion or improvement of the library.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 402, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-3205.1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1965, No. 402, § 1, is also codified as §13-2-405.

13-2-505. Donations for library.

(a)

Any person desiring to make donations of money, personal property, or real estate for the benefit of a library shall have the right to vest the title to the money or real estate so donated in the board of trustees of the library created under this subchapter.

(b)

The money or real estate shall be held and controlled by the board, when accepted, according to the terms of the deed, gift, devise, or bequest of the property.

(c)

As to the property, the board shall be considered trustees.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 177, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 9596; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-3207.

13-2-506. Injuries to library property — Penalty.

(a)

In addition to any penalties prescribed and notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in the Arkansas Library Materials Security Law, §13-2-801 et seq., the city council or governing body of a city shall have the power to pass ordinances imposing suitable penalties for the punishment of persons committing injury upon library grounds or property or injuring or failing to return any book, periodical, or property belonging to the library.

(b)

The board of trustees of the library may refuse the use of the library to such offenders.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 177, § 8; Pope's Dig., § 9597; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-3208; Acts 1997, No. 402, § 9.

13-2-507. Contracts for library services outside the city — Fees for special library services.

(a)

The board of trustees of the library may extend the privilege and use of the library to persons residing outside the city upon such terms and conditions as the board may prescribe by its regulations or its policies.

(b)

The board may also contract for library service or for the privilege and use of the library with the county quorum court, the municipal authorities of a neighboring city, town, or village, or school authorities.

(c)

In addition, reasonable reimbursements may be collected by the city public library for providing any special library services beyond the customary library services, provided they are determined in advance and in writing by the board.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 177, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 9595; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-3206; Acts 1997, No. 402, § 10.

13-2-508. Joint municipal libraries — Joint city-county libraries.

(a)

When any city council or governing body of a city of the first class shall have decided to establish and maintain a public library under the terms of this subchapter, the city board of trustees of the library appointed pursuant to this subchapter in fulfilling the purposes of this subchapter may contract with the municipal authorities of a neighboring city within this state or without this state if the city limits of the neighboring city so without this state extend to the state line of this state and are contiguous to the city limits of the city of the first class within this state, whereby a common library for the residents of both cities may be established and maintained by both cities.

(b)

The contract shall provide for the division of the total cost of establishing, maintaining, and operating the library between the cities, even though the library is located without this state.

(c)

However, the contract shall become effective only from and after its ratification by a majority of the elected members of the city council or the governing body of a city of the first class.

(d)(1)

The city board of trustees, with the consent of its governing body of the city, and the county library board, with the consent of the county quorum court, or any group of municipal public libraries, and any combination of them, may contract with each other or among themselves to create, maintain, and support a joint city-county public library system or regional public library system or may enter into an interlocal cooperation agreement among themselves to coordinate public library services among the different jurisdictions.

(2)

Such a contract or interlocal agreement shall contain terms, agreements, and conditions as may be agreed upon by the city board of trustees, the county library board of trustees, the county quorum court, and the board of trustees of the several municipalities.

(e)

Any library or joint city-county library or other library system created under this section for coordination of library services when so established and operated shall be a public city library for all the intents and purposes of this subchapter and of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 30.

(f)

This section does not repeal any existing law and shall be cumulative to the provisions of §§13-2-501 —13-2-503,13-2-505 —13-2-507, and13-2-509.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 36, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 19-3210, 19-3211, 19-3211n; Acts 1997, No. 402, § 11.

13-2-509. Trustees' report.

(a)

At the end of each fiscal year, the board of trustees of the library shall present a report of the condition of the trust to the city council. This report shall be verified under oath by the secretary or some responsible person.

(b)

It shall contain:

(1)

An itemized statement of the various sums of money received from the library fund and other sources;

(2)

A statement of the number of books and periodicals available for use and the number and character thereof circulated;

(3)

A statement of the real and personal property received by devise, bequest, purchase, gift, or otherwise;

(4)

A statement of the character of any extension of library service which may have been undertaken;

(5)

A statement of the financial requirements of the library for the ensuing year; and

(6)

Any other statistics, information, or suggestions that might be of interest.

(c)

A copy of this report shall be filed with the State Library Board.

History.

Acts 1931, No. 177, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 9598; Acts 1951, No. 299, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 19-3209.

13-2-510. City and town library services.

(a)(1)

Any city of the first class, city of the second class, or incorporated town in Arkansas may provide for library services for its citizens or may enter into agreements or contracts for library services with other political subdivisions or join with other political subdivisions to form regional library systems to provide library services for its citizens.

(2)

The governing body of the city of the first class, city of the second class, or incorporated town may expend available municipal funds for the support, operation, and maintenance of any service, contract, agreement, or library system in which the municipality participates for library services for its citizens.

(b)

The provisions of this subchapter shall not be construed to restrict or prohibit any cities of the first class, cities of the second class, or incorporated towns from entering into interlocal cooperation agreements with other cities, counties, or regional library systems to better coordinate the provision of services to their inhabitants.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 402, § 12.

Subchapter 6

— Interstate Library Compact

Effective Dates.

Acts 1967, No. 419, § 7: July 1, 1967.

13-2-601. Definition.

As used in this compact, “state library agency”, with reference to this state, means the State Library Board.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 419, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-312.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1979, No. 489, § 9, provided in part, that all powers, functions, and duties of the Arkansas Library Commission with respect to the Interstate Library Compact should be performed by the State Library and the State Library Board.